dictsource/bpy_rules
// Pronounciation rule for Manipuri.
// This file is UTF8 encoded

// letter groups:
// A   vowel letters and vowel signs
// B   vowel signs and virama ्
// C   consonants
// Y   vowel letters and vowel signs



.replace
 ০	0
 ১	1
 ২	2
 ৩	3
 ৪	4
 ৫	5
 ৬	6
 ৭	7
 ৮	8
 ৯	9


// Vowels


.group অ
       অ        @
       অঁ        O~
       অ্যা       &          // V,ja in [æmiba]


.group আ
       আ        a:
       আঁ        a~

.group ই
        ই        i
        ইঁ        i~


.group ঈ
        ঈ        i
        ঈঁ        i~
  _)ঈ(_C  i


.group উ
        উ        u
        উঁ        u~


.group ঊ
        ঊ        u
        ঊঁ        u~


.group ঐ
        ঐ        oj
        ঐঁ        o~j


.group এ
        এ        e
        এঁ        e~

        এ্যা       &    // e,ja  [ækademi]


.group ও
        ও        o
        ওঁ        o~


.group ঔ
        ঔ        ow
        ঔঁ        o~w

.group ও //??
        ও        o:




// Vowel Signs

.group া
	C) া	a
	C) াঁ	a~

.group ি
	C) ি	i
	C) িঁ	i~

.group ী
	C) ী	i
	C) ীঁ	i~

.group ূ
	C) ূ	u
	C) ূঁ	u~

.group ু
	C) ু	u
	C) ুঁ	u~

.group ৃ
	C) ৃ	r'i
	C) ৃঁ	r'i~

.group ে
	C) ে	e
	C) েঁ	e~
	C) েউ	ew

.group ৈ
	C) ৈ	oj
	C) ৈঁ	o~j

.group ো
	C) ো	o
	C) োঁ	o~

.group ৌ
	C) ৌ	ow
	C) ৌঁ	o~w



// Consonants

.group ক
        ক	k@
        ক (B	k
        ক (C	kO
   _)ক (C	kO
   _)ক (B	k

.group খ
        খ	kh@
        খ (B	kh
    _)খ (C	khO
    _)খ (B	kh

.group গ
        গ	g@
         গ (B	g
         গ (C	g
   _)গ (C	g@
   _)গ (B	g

.group ঘ
        ঘ        g#@
        ঘ (B	gh
        ঘ (C	gh@
   _)ঘ (C	gh@
   _)ঘ (B	gh

.group ঙ
        ঙ	Ng
        ঙ (B	N~
   _)ঙ (B	N~

.group চ
        চ	c@
        চ (B	c
        চ(C	c@
   _)চ(C	c@
   _)চ(B	c

.group ছ
        ছ	chO
        ছ  (B	ch
  _)ছ  (B	ch
  _)ছ  (C	chO


.group জ
        জ	J@
        জ (B	J
        জ (_	J
        জ (C	J
   C)জ (C	J@
   _)জ (C	J@
   _)জ (B	J
        জ্ব		JV
        জ্ব (B	J
        জ্ঞ		ggo~
        জ্ঞ (B	gg~



.group ঝ
        ঝ	Jh@
        ঝ (B	Jh
   _)ঝ (B	Jh
   _)ঝ (C	JhO

.group ঞ
        ঞ        nV
        ঞ (B     n
   জ)ঞ (B     gg


.group ট
        ট	t.O
        ট (B	t.
  _)ট (B	t.
  _)ট (C	t.O


.group ঠ
        ঠ	thO
        ঠ (B	t.h
  _)ঠ (B	t.h
  _)ঠ (C	t.hO


.group ড
        ড	d.O
        ড (B	d.
  _)ড (B	d.
  _)ড (C	d.O

        ড়        r.     // nukta
        ড় (B     r.


.group ঢ
        ঢ	d.h
        ঢ (B	d.h
   _)ঢ (C	d.hO

        ঢ়	hr.
        ঢ় (B	hr.


.group ণ
        ণ	nO
        ণ (B	n



.group ত
        ত	t
        ত (B	t
        ত (C	t
        ত (_	to
  _)ত (C	to

.group থ
        থ	thO
        থ (B	th
        থ (_	thO
  _)থ (B	th
  _)থ (C	thO

.group দ
        দ	dO
        দ (B	d
        দ (_	dO
   _)দ (C	dO

.group ধ
        ধ	dhO
        ধ (B	dh
   _)ধ (C	dhO

.group ন
        ন	nO
        ন (B	n
   _)ন (B	n
         ন (C	nO
   _)ন (C	nO
.group প
        প	pO
        প (B	p
   _)প(C	pO
   _)প(B	p
         প (_	p

.group ফ
        ফ	fO
        ফ (B	f
  _)ফ (B	f
  _)ফ (C	fa
       ফ (C	fO

.group ব
        ব	bO
        ব (B	b
   _)ব(C	bO
         ব(_	b


.group ভ
        ভ	bh@
        ভ (B	bh
        ভ (C	bhO
        ভ (_	bh

.group ম
        ম	m@
        ম (B	m
   _)ম (C	m@
   _)ম (B	m
         ম (C	m@

.group য
        য	dZ@
        য (B	dZ
        য (C	dZ
   _)য(C	dZO

        য়	j@   // nukta
     _) য় (B	j@

.group র
        র	r@
        র (B	r
        র (_	r
   _)র (C	r@

.group ল
        ল	l@
        ল  (B	l
        ল  (_	l
        ল  (C	l@
.group ৱ
        ৱ	wa
        ৱ (B	w@
       ৱ (C	w@
  _) ৱ (B	w@
  _) ৱ (C	w@

.group শ
        শ	S@  // or [s] ?
        শ (B	S
        শ (C	S
  _)শ (C	S@
.group ষ
        ষ	S@
        ষ (B	S
  _)ষ (C	S@

.group স
        স	s@  /
        স (B	S
   _)স (C	sa
         স (C	s@

.group হ
        হ	h@
        হ (B	h
        হ (_	h
 _) হ (C	h@

.group ক্ষ
        ক্ষ	k#k#@
        ক্ষ (B	k#k#
        ক্ষ (C	k#k#


.group ড় 			// rarely used
        ড়	r.
        ড় (B	r.


.group ঢ়     			// rarely used, or not used?
        ঢ়	hr.
        ঢ় (B	hr.
        ঢ় (_	hr.o

.group য়
        য়	j@
  _)য়(B		j@
       য়(B		j@


.group ং
  A)ং		N
  C)ং		N

.group ঃ              // visarga/bishorgo
        ঃ             // doubles the following consonant
        ঃ (_      H

.group ্		// virama/hoshonto
     C) ্

.group ৎ	//khOndott'O
    C)ৎ		t

.group ়
	়		// nukta, modifies a consonant
